District of Columbia statutes.
32-812

Penalties for violation of subchapter; jurisdiction; prosecution.

Whoever violates any of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations promulgated hereunder, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor; and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $600, or by imprisonment of not exceeding 90 days. Prosecutions for violations of this subchapter shall be in the name of the District of Columbia on information filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or one of his assistants.

History

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 12
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438, § 3
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1936, Pub. L. 91-650, title V, § 501(4)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-232.
1973 Ed., § 36-442.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 32-801.